Washington statutes.
RCW 15.130.200

Adulterated food prohibited.

(1) A person may not:

(a) Cause or intend to cause adulteration of food in intrastate commerce;

(b) Sell, process, or store adulterated food in intrastate commerce; or

(c) Receive for the purpose of sale in intrastate commerce food known to be adulterated.

(2) Food is adulterated if it is adulterated within the meaning of 21 U.S.C. Sec. 342, or is adulterated in accordance with department rules.

[ 2018 c 236 s 201.]